Hawaii statutes.
[§571-22.5] Appeal of waiver of
jurisdiction. An order waiving jurisdiction shall not be appealable as a
final order, but may only be appealable in conjunction with an appeal of all
other issues after a trial on the charge against such minor or adult. [L 1980,
c 207, §1]

Case Notes

Does not permit appellate review of order denying waiver of
jurisdiction. 66 H. 516, 668 P.2d 25.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next